Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1119.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8902(a)(1) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8902. Exemption.(a) General rule.--Any resident of this Commonwealth shall be exempt from the payment of all real estate taxes levied upon any building, including the land upon which it stands, occupied by that person as a principal dwelling, if all of the following requirements are met:(1) That person has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from the armed forces of the United States [for service in any war or armed 1234567891011121314151617 conflict in which this nation was engaged].* * *(a.1) Proportional exemption.--Any resident of this Commonwealth who does not qualify under subsection (a) shall be proportionally exempt from real estate taxes levied upon any building, including the land upon which the building stands, occupied by that person as a principal dwelling if all of the following requirements are met:(1) That person has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from the armed forces of the United States.(2) As a result of military service, that person has a service-connected disability between 10% and 90% as declared by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its successors. The amount of property tax reduction shall be proportional to the service-connected disability rating of the resident.(3) The dwelling is owned by that person solely, with his or her spouse or as an estate by the entireties.(4) The need for the exemption from the payment of real estate taxes has been determined by the State Veterans Commission in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1119PN1240 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425